Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 4

Officers [Repealed]

6-1-401 — 6-1-406. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 6-1-401 — 6-1-406 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 6, 8-12; Shan., §§ 1942-1947; Code 1932, §§ 3360-3365; Acts 1959, ch. 232, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, § 7; 1963, ch. 298, §§ 1, 2; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 9-12; 1973, ch. 275, §§ 1-3; 1976, ch. 581, § 1; 1976, ch. 703, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 583, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-127 — 6-132; Acts 1982, ch. 715, § 1; 1986, ch. 642, § 1; 1988, ch. 786, § 1; 1989, ch. 98, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 1068, §§ 1, 2), concerning officers of municipalities, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.